Hawaii statutes.
[§480E-9] Distressed property lease. (a)
A distressed property lease shall be in writing and shall fully disclose:

(1) All rights and obligations of the distressed
property lessor and distressed property lessee;

(2) The exact terms of the agreement between the
distressed property lessor and distressed property lessee;

(3) The exact period of time the distressed property
lease is to be in effect; and

(4) The total amount and terms of compensation to be
directly or indirectly received by the distressed property lessor.

(b) Distressed property lessees shall be
afforded all rights under the landlord-tenant law of the State. No distressed
property lease shall provide a distressed property lessee with rights less than
those provided by the State's landlord-tenant law as set forth in chapters 521
and 666.

(c) The first page of a distressed property
lease shall contain in a type size no smaller than fourteen-point boldface
type:

(1) A description of the distressed property;

(2) The name, street address, and telephone number of
the distressed property lessor; and

(3) The name and address of the distressed property
lessor to which lease or rental payments, correspondence, and notices are to be
mailed.

(d) A distressed property lease shall be dated
and signed by the distressed property lessor. If the distressed property
lessor is a person other than an individual, the individual executing the
distressed property lease on behalf of the distressed property lessor shall
identify the title and office held by the individual.

(e) A distressed property lease shall be dated
and signed by all lessees of the distressed property.

(f) The distressed property lessor shall
provide each distressed property lessee with a copy of the distressed property
lease immediately upon execution by all parties to the distressed property
lease. A distressed property lease shall not be effective until all parties to
the distressed property lease have signed the lease. [L 2008, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next